Arkansas, session 2025, HB1310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the Arkansas Commission for
the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative.
(a) The Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood
Initiative is abolished, and its authority, duties, functions, records,
contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations,
allocations, and other funds, including without limitation the functions of
budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences.
(b) The Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood
Initiative's statutory powers, duties, and functions, including without
*JMB155*
01/29/2025 2:04:56 PM JMB155

HB1310
limitation the functions of budgeting or purchasing, records, contracts,
personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations,
and other funds are transferred to the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the Arkansas Commission for the Newborn
Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative does not affect the orders, rules,
directives, registration, licensing, or standards made or promulgated by the
Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative before
the effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, and
standards of the Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood
Initiative shall continue to be in effect until they are amended or repealed
under authority given by law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-8-504 is amended to read as follows:
20-8-504. Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative Bank.
(a)(1) On or before June 30, 2008, the Arkansas Commission for the
Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative The University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences shall establish a network of postnatal tissue and fluid
banks in partnership with one (1) or more public or private colleges or
universities, public or private hospitals, nonprofit organizations, or
private firms and maintain the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Bank in this
state for the purpose of collecting and storing postnatal tissue and fluid.
(2) The Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Bank shall create a
voluntary program to make tissue and fluid available for scientific research
and medical treatment in accordance with this subchapter.
(3) A parent of a child born in this state may voluntarily
contribute postnatal tissue and fluid to the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood
Bank.
(b)(1) The commission Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Bank shall develop
a voluntary program to educate pregnant patients women with respect to the
banking of postnatal tissue and fluid.
(2) The program shall include:
(A) An explanation of the difference between public and
private postnatal tissue and fluid banking programs;
(B) The medical process involved in the collection and
01/29/2025 2:04:56 PM JMB155

HB1310
storage of postnatal tissue and fluid;
(C) The current and potential future medical uses of
stored postnatal tissue and fluid;
(D) The benefits and risks involved in the banking of
postnatal tissue and fluid; and
(E) The availability and cost of storing postnatal tissue
and fluid in public and private umbilical cord blood banks.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-8-505 is repealed.
20-8-505. Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood
Initiative — Creation — Members.
(a) The Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood
Initiative is created.
(b)(1) The commission shall consist of eleven (11) members appointed
as follows:
(A) Three (3) members appointed by the Governor as
follows:
(i) One (1) member who is a physician licensed by
the Arkansas State Medical Board;
(ii) One (1) member who has a financial background;
and
(iii) One (1) member who has a legal background or an
ethicist background, or both;
(B) Three (3) members appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives as follows:
(i) One (1) member who is a physician licensed by
the board;
(ii) One (1) member who has a financial background;
and
(iii) One (1) member who has a legal background or an
ethicist background, or both;
(C) Three (3) members appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate as follows:
(i) One (1) member who is a physician licensed by
the board;
(ii) One (1) member who has a financial background;
01/29/2025 2:04:56 PM JMB155

HB1310
and
(iii) One (1) member who has a legal background or an
ethicist background, or both;
(D) The Dean of the Fay W. Boozman College of Public
Health of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences or his or her
designee; and
(E) The Secretary of the Department of Health or his or
her designee.
(2) The commission shall include one (1) consultant, nonvoting
member who shall be the Director of Cell Therapy and Transfusion Medicine of
the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences.
(c) The Governor shall designate one (1) member as chair of the
commission.
(d) The chair shall call the first meeting of the commission within
sixty (60) days of his or her appointment.
(e)(1) At the first meeting of the commission, the members shall draw
lots so that three (3) members serve two-year terms, three (3) members serve
three-year terms, and three (3) members serve four-year terms.
(2) After the initial terms, members shall serve four-year
terms.
(f) The commission shall meet at least one (1) time per year.
(g)(1) A majority of the membership of the commission shall constitute
a quorum.
(2) A majority vote of those members present shall be required
for any action of the commission.
(h) Vacancies on the commission due to death, resignation, removal, or
other causes shall be filled in the same manner as is provided in this
section for initial appointments.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 20-8-506 is amended to read as follows:
20-8-506. Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood
Initiative Medical director of Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Bank — Powers and
duties.
(a) The Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood
Initiative medical director of the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Bank shall:
(1) Investigate the implementation of this subchapter and
01/29/2025 2:04:56 PM JMB155

HB1310
recommend improvements in this subchapter to the General Assembly;
(2) Make available to the public the records of all meetings of
the commission and of all business transacted by the commission;
(3)(2) Oversee the operations of the Newborn Umbilical Cord
Blood Bank, including without limitation the approval of all fees established
to cover administration, collection, and storage costs;
(4)(3) Undertake the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative by
promoting awareness of the blood bank and encouraging Promote awareness of
the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Bank and encourage donation of postnatal
tissue and fluid to the blood bank;
(5)(4) Ensure the privacy of persons who donate umbilical cord
blood, amniotic fluid, and placental tissue to the blood bank;
(6)(5) Develop a plan for making postnatal tissue and fluid
collected under the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative the Newborn
Umbilical Cord Blood Bank available for scientific research and medical
treatment in compliance with all relevant national practice and quality
standards;
(7)(6) Develop a plan for private storage of postnatal tissue
and fluid for medical treatment; and
(8)(7) Participate in the National Cord Blood Program and
register postnatal tissue and fluid collected with registries operating in
connection with the National Cord Blood Program;
(9) If funds are available, request the Department of Health to
employ staff and enter into contracts necessary to implement this subchapter,
and reimburse the department for the cost of implementing this subchapter;
and
(10) Report annually to the General Assembly on or before October
1 of each year concerning the activities of the commission.
(b) The commission medical director of the Newborn Umbilical Cord
Blood Bank may seek additional funding from any source, including without
limitation federal grants and private grants.
(c) The medical director of the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Bank
shall be a faculty member at the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 25-43-802(a)(8), concerning the state
entities transferred to the Department of Health, is repealed.
01/29/2025 2:04:56 PM JMB155

HB1310
(8) The Arkansas Commission for the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood
Initiative, created under § 20-8-505;

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is important to the
citizens of Arkansas that state government services be provided in an
efficient and cost-effective manner; that the abolition of commissions that
are not operational is an effective way to achieve both operational
efficiencies and economies of scale; that this act is immediately necessary
to obtain cost efficiencies and streamline the provision of government
services without delay for the benefit of Arkansas taxpayers to allow
services that preserve the health, safety, and property of Arkansas citizens;
and that this act transferring the duties of the Arkansas Commission for the
Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative to the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences and abolishment of the Arkansas Commission for the Newborn
Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative should become effective on July 1, 2025, to
coincide with the appropriation bills of the University of Arkansas and
ensure that the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Bank provides its expanded vital
services as the transfer of duties is implemented and does not experience any
issues with funding under the transfer of duties. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.














01/29/2025 2:04:56 PM JMB155